Illinois, session 104th, HB1120.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 6-110 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-110)7    Sec. 6-110. Licenses issued to drivers. 8    (a) The Secretary of State shall issue to every qualifying 9applicant a driver's license as applied for, which license 10shall bear a distinguishing number assigned to the licensee, 11the legal name, signature, zip code, date of birth, residence 12address, and a brief description of the licensee. 13    Licenses issued shall also indicate the classification and 14the restrictions under Section 6-104 of this Code. The 15Secretary may adopt rules to establish informational 16restrictions that can be placed on the driver's license 17regarding specific conditions of the licensee.18    A driver's license issued may, in the discretion of the 19Secretary, include a suitable photograph of a type prescribed 20by the Secretary. 21    (a-1) If the licensee is less than 18 years of age, unless 22one of the exceptions in subsection (a-2) apply, the license 23shall, as a matter of law, be invalid for the operation of any   HB1120 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 05997 LNS 16030 b1motor vehicle during the following times:2        (A) Between 11:00 p.m. Friday and 6:00 a.m. Saturday;3        (B) Between 11:00 p.m. Saturday and 6:00 a.m. on 4    Sunday; and5        (C) Between 10:00 p.m. on Sunday to Thursday, 6    inclusive, and 6:00 a.m. on the following day.7    (a-2) The driver's license of a person under the age of 18 8shall not be invalid as described in subsection (a-1) of this 9Section if the licensee under the age of 18 was:10        (1) accompanied by the licensee's parent or guardian 11    or other person in custody or control of the minor;12        (2) on an errand at the direction of the minor's 13    parent or guardian, without any detour or stop;14        (3) in a motor vehicle involved in interstate travel;15        (4) going to or returning home from an employment 16    activity, without any detour or stop;17        (5) involved in an emergency;18        (6) going to or returning home from, without any 19    detour or stop, an official school, religious, or other 20    recreational activity supervised by adults and sponsored 21    by a government or governmental agency, a civic 22    organization, or another similar entity that takes 23    responsibility for the licensee, without any detour or 24    stop;25        (7) exercising First Amendment rights protected by the 26    United States Constitution, such as the free exercise of   HB1120 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 05997 LNS 16030 b1    religion, freedom of speech, and the right of assembly; or2        (8) married or had been married or is an emancipated 3    minor under the Emancipation of Minors Act.4    (a-2.5) The driver's license of a person who is 17 years of 5age and has been licensed for at least 12 months is not invalid 6as described in subsection (a-1) of this Section while the 7licensee is participating as an assigned driver in a Safe 8Rides program that meets the following criteria: 9        (1) the program is sponsored by the Boy Scouts of 10    America or another national public service organization; 11    and12        (2) the sponsoring organization carries liability 13    insurance covering the program. 14    (a-3) If a graduated driver's license holder over the age 15of 18 committed an offense against traffic regulations 16governing the movement of vehicles or any violation of Section 176-107 or Section 12-603.1 of this Code in the 6 months prior to 18the graduated driver's license holder's 18th birthday, and was 19subsequently convicted of the offense, the provisions of 20subsection (a-1) shall continue to apply until such time as a 21period of 6 consecutive months has elapsed without an 22additional violation and subsequent conviction of an offense 23against traffic regulations governing the movement of vehicles 24or Section 6-107 or Section 12-603.1 of this Code. 25    (a-4) If an applicant for a driver's license or 26instruction permit has a current identification card issued by   HB1120 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 05997 LNS 16030 b1the Secretary of State, the Secretary may require the 2applicant to utilize the same residence address and name on 3the identification card, driver's license, and instruction 4permit records maintained by the Secretary. The Secretary may 5promulgate rules to implement this provision. 6    (a-5) If an applicant for a driver's license is an 7employee of the Department of Children and Family Services 8with a job title of "Child Protection Specialist Trainee", 9"Child Protection Specialist", "Child Protection Advanced 10Specialist", "Child Welfare Specialist Trainee", "Child 11Welfare Specialist", or "Child Welfare Advanced Specialist" or 12a judicial officer or a peace officer, the applicant may elect 13to have his or her office or work address listed on the license 14instead of the applicant's residence or mailing address. The 15Secretary of State shall adopt rules to implement this 16subsection (a-5). For the purposes of this subsection (a-5), 17"peace officer" means any person who by virtue of his or her 18office or public employment is vested by law with a duty to 19maintain public order or to make arrests for a violation of any 20penal statute of this State, whether that duty extends to all 21violations or is limited to specific violations. 22    (b) Until the Secretary of State establishes a First 23Person Consent organ and tissue donor registry under Section 246-117 of this Code, the Secretary of State shall provide a 25format on the reverse of each driver's license issued which 26the licensee may use to execute a document of gift conforming   HB1120 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 05997 LNS 16030 b1to the provisions of the Illinois Anatomical Gift Act. The 2format shall allow the licensee to indicate the gift intended, 3whether specific organs, any organ, or the entire body, and 4shall accommodate the signatures of the donor and 2 witnesses. 5The Secretary shall also inform each applicant or licensee of 6this format, describe the procedure for its execution, and may 7offer the necessary witnesses; provided that in so doing, the 8Secretary shall advise the applicant or licensee that he or 9she is under no compulsion to execute a document of gift. A 10brochure explaining this method of executing an anatomical 11gift document shall be given to each applicant or licensee. 12The brochure shall advise the applicant or licensee that he or 13she is under no compulsion to execute a document of gift, and 14that he or she may wish to consult with family, friends, or 15clergy before doing so. The Secretary of State may undertake 16additional efforts, including education and awareness 17activities, to promote organ and tissue donation. 18    (c) The Secretary of State shall designate on each 19driver's license issued a space where the licensee may place a 20sticker or decal of the uniform size as the Secretary may 21specify, which sticker or decal may indicate in appropriate 22language that the owner of the license carries an Emergency 23Medical Information Card. 24    The sticker may be provided by any person, hospital, 25school, medical group, or association interested in assisting 26in implementing the Emergency Medical Information Card, but   HB1120 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 05997 LNS 16030 b1shall meet the specifications as the Secretary may by rule or 2regulation require. 3    (d) (Blank). The Secretary of State shall designate on 4each driver's license issued a space where the licensee may 5indicate his blood type and RH factor.6    (e) The Secretary of State shall provide that each 7original or renewal driver's license issued to a licensee 8under 21 years of age shall be of a distinct nature from those 9driver's licenses issued to individuals 21 years of age and 10older. The color designated for driver's licenses for 11licensees under 21 years of age shall be at the discretion of 12the Secretary of State. 13    (e-1) The Secretary shall provide that each driver's 14license issued to a person under the age of 21 displays the 15date upon which the person becomes 18 years of age and the date 16upon which the person becomes 21 years of age. 17    (e-3) The General Assembly recognizes the need to identify 18military veterans living in this State for the purpose of 19ensuring that they receive all of the services and benefits to 20which they are legally entitled, including health care 21healthcare, education assistance, and job placement. To assist 22the State in identifying these veterans and delivering these 23vital services and benefits, the Secretary of State is 24authorized to issue drivers' licenses with the word "veteran" 25appearing on the face of the licenses. This authorization is 26predicated on the unique status of veterans. The Secretary may   HB1120 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 05997 LNS 16030 b1not issue any other driver's license which identifies an 2occupation, status, affiliation, hobby, or other unique 3characteristics of the license holder which is unrelated to 4the purpose of the driver's license.5    (e-5) Beginning on or before July 1, 2015, the Secretary 6of State shall designate a space on each original or renewal 7driver's license where, at the request of the applicant, the 8word "veteran" shall be placed. The veteran designation shall 9be available to a person identified as a veteran under 10subsection (e) of Section 6-106 of this Code who was 11discharged or separated under honorable conditions. 12    (e-7) Upon providing the required documentation, at the 13request of the applicant, the driver's license may reflect 14Gold Star Family designation. The Secretary shall designate a 15space on each original or renewal driver's license for such 16designation. This designation shall be available to a person 17eligible for Gold Star license plates under subsection (f) of 18Section 6-106 of this Code. 19    (f) The Secretary of State shall inform all Illinois 20licensed commercial motor vehicle operators of the 21requirements of the Uniform Commercial Driver License Act, 22Article V of this Chapter, and shall make provisions to insure 23that all drivers, seeking to obtain a commercial driver's 24license, be afforded an opportunity prior to April 1, 1992, to 25obtain the license. The Secretary is authorized to extend 26driver's license expiration dates, and assign specific times,   HB1120 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 05997 LNS 16030 b1dates and locations where these commercial driver's tests 2shall be conducted. Any applicant, regardless of the current 3expiration date of the applicant's driver's license, may be 4subject to any assignment by the Secretary. Failure to comply 5with the Secretary's assignment may result in the applicant's 6forfeiture of an opportunity to receive a commercial driver's 7license prior to April 1, 1992. 8    (g) The Secretary of State shall designate on a driver's 9license issued, a space where the licensee may indicate that 10he or she has drafted a living will in accordance with the 11Illinois Living Will Act or a durable power of attorney for 12health care in accordance with the Illinois Power of Attorney 13Act. 14    (g-1) The Secretary of State, in his or her discretion, 15may designate on each driver's license issued a space where 16the licensee may place a sticker or decal, issued by the 17Secretary of State, of uniform size as the Secretary may 18specify, that shall indicate in appropriate language that the 19owner of the license has renewed his or her driver's license. 20    (h) A person who acts in good faith in accordance with the 21terms of this Section is not liable for damages in any civil 22action or subject to prosecution in any criminal proceeding 23for his or her act. 24    (i) The Secretary shall designate a space on each original 25or renewal of a driver's license, at the request of the 26applicant, for a designation as a Gold Star Family. This   HB1120 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 05997 LNS 16030 b1designation shall be available to a person eligible for Gold 2Star license plates under subsection (f) of Section 6-106 of 3this Code. 4(Source: P.A. 103-888, eff. 8-9-24; 103-933, eff. 1-1-25; 5revised 11-26-24.)